Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.610

Directors, committees—Meetings authorized by conference telephone or similar communications equipment.

Except as may be otherwise restricted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, members of the board of directors or any committee designated by the board of directors may participate in a meeting of the board or committee by means of a conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time. Participation by such means shall constitute presence, in person, at a meeting.

[ 1986 c 279 s 48. Formerly RCW 30.04.610.]